California, session 20252026, AB1761.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 365.4 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:365.4. (a) The commission shall ensure that all data relied on in serving as a basis for any decision or ruling, ruling issued by the commission, or in any proposal or analysis provided by an electrical corporation, the commission’s staff, or any other party, commission staff, for the determination or application of a calculation methodology for any charge imposed on customers of a load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, entity to recover the cost of contracts or resources owned by an electrical corporation or any value derived from that calculation costs associated with contracts, electrical corporation-owned generation, or any other resource or value included in that charge and any other charge derived from those costs, is made available to load-serving entities and ratepayer advocates on behalf of customers.(b) The commission shall require an electrical corporation or other party, in submitting a proposal or analysis for the determination or application of a calculation methodology for any charge imposed on customers of a load-serving entity to recover costs associated with contracts, electrical corporation-owned generation, or any other resource or value included in that charge and any other charge derived from those costs, to make all data serving as a basis for that proposal or analysis available to load-serving entities and ratepayer advocates on behalf of customers.(c) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), a charge imposed on customers of a load-serving entity includes any charge determined or applied pursuant to subdivision (f), (g), or (h) of Section 366.2, and any other charge authorized by the commission to recover the costs of contracts or resources procured for the benefit of bundled customers, regardless of whether the charge is expressly enumerated in those subdivisions.(b)(d) Data provided pursuant to subdivision subdivisions (a) and (b) shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) It shall be made through a public disclosure, except for market-sensitive data, which shall be made through disclosure to a nonmarket participant reviewing representative pursuant to the terms of a reasonable, commission-approved nondisclosure agreement.(2) It shall be made available to load-serving entities and ratepayer advocates concurrent with any proposal or analyses from the electrical corporation, the commission’s staff, or any other party, or any commission adopted outcome. commission-adopted decision or ruling. This requirement may be met through adoption of data sharing practices mutually agreed to by parties at the outset of a proceeding.(3) It shall be made available in native file format. (e) A failure to comply with this section, or the identification of good faith errors, omissions, or inaccuracies in data disclosed pursuant to this section, shall not, by itself, invalidate, impair, stay, or otherwise affect the validity of any calculation methodology, charge, decision, or ruling adopted by the commission, unless the failure, good faith error, omission, or inaccuracy constitutes one or more of the grounds specified in Section 1757 or 1757.1.(f) For purposes of this section, “load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.